Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.160

Penalties.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 19.158.150, any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or who knowingly, directly or indirectly employs any device, scheme or artifice to deceive in connection with the offer or sale by any commercial telephone solicitor is guilty of the following:

(a) If the value of a transaction made in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1) is less than fifty dollars, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor;

(b) If the value of a transaction made in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1) is fifty dollars or more, then the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor; and

(c) If the value of a transaction made in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1) is two hundred fifty dollars or more, then the person is guilty of a class C felony.

(2) When any series of transactions which constitute a violation of this section would, when considered separately, constitute a series of misdemeanors or gross misdemeanors because of the value of the transactions, and the series of transactions are part of a common scheme or plan, the transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all the transactions shall be the value considered in determining whether the violations are to be punished as a class C felony or a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 160; 1989 c 20 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.